Hawaii statutes.
§166-9 Rules. The board shall adopt
rules in accordance with chapter 91 in order to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter. Such rules shall provide, without limitation, for definitions;
planning generally and for intensive agricultural uses; general eligibility
requirements; qualifications of applicants; preference rights; disposition of
leases; lease provisions; lease restrictions generally and for intensive
agricultural uses; and notice of breach or default. Rules adopted by the board
for the purposes of this chapter shall be consistent with sections 171-11 and
171-20. [L 1986, c 222, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 22, §5; am L 1990, c 52, §6]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next